Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1606
Optional health insurance coverage; authorized.

The personnel division of the Department of Administrative Services may elect to offer a group health insurance option to employees subject to sections 84-1601 to 84-1615. Such benefits shall be offered at the rates listed in section 84-1611, and additional contributions necessary to cover the costs of such benefits may be required from employees.

Laws 1983, LB 632, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-1622.01;

Laws 1989, LB 303, § 4;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 14, § 35;

Laws 1993, LB 325, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1252, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 51.